California, session 20252026, AB1832.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. This act shall be known, and may be cited, as the 2-1-1 Infrastructure and Emergency Response Act.SEC. 2. The Legislature finds and declares both of the following:(a) Californians must be able to access 2-1-1 essential community services and critical communications infrastructure year-round and during disasters.(b) Because the 2-1-1 system serves such a wide range of populations and service categories and has no dedicated funding source, unlike 9-1-1 and 9-8-8, it would benefit the public to create a fund to pool funding from different sources unless or until a dedicated funding source for the 2-1-1 system is identified.SEC. 3.Section 8588.4 is added to the Government Code, to read:8588.4.(a)The office shall convene state emergency planning agencies, including the Public Utilities Commission, the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection, the State Department of Social Services, the State Department of Public Health, and the 2-1-1 lead entity appointed by the Public Utilities Commission, to do both of the following:(1)Establish communication channels between state emergency planning agencies, the 2-1-1 lead entity appointed by the Public Utilities Commission, and 2-1-1 providers, as set forth in Public Utilities Commission Decision 11-09-016 (September 8, 2011), Decision Granting Authority to Provide Emergency Access to 211 Services in Counties and Localities Without Existing 211 Centers and to Appoint a 211 Lead Entity, including adding 2-1-1 to emergency notification and coordination channels.(2)Integrate 2-1-1 into the state emergency planning and emergency communication processes.SEC. 3. Section 8588.4 is added to the Government Code, to read:8588.4. (a) There is hereby created in the State Treasury the 2-1-1 Fund, the moneys in which shall be used for purposes of subdivisions (c) and (d), upon appropriation by the Legislature.(b) The office shall allocate moneys appropriated from the 2-1-1 Fund to the California 211 Providers Network, also known as 211 California, to carry out the actions pursuant to subdivisions (c) and (d).(b)(c) The office shall support 2-1-1 providers in doing moneys in the fund shall be used for all of the following: following purposes:(1) Enhancing critical 2-1-1 system capacity and service quality through core operating support, including all of the following:(A) Staffing to handle 2-1-1 contacts.(B) Training, supervision, and quality assurance.(C) Consistent data collection and reporting.(D) Multilingual and multichannel access through modern technology and infrastructure.(2) Providing equitable access to 2-1-1 dialing and services by closing 2-1-1 coverage gaps and ensuring basic 2-1-1 service access statewide.(3) Publishing a statewide 2-1-1 community needs data dashboard for use by state agencies in monitoring and identifying community and disaster needs and resource gaps, and to inform efficient and responsive resource allocation.(4) Strengthening 2-1-1 community resource databases and enable resource data sharing and delivery to state agencies, health systems, and other key partners, and reduce redundancies in resource directory building and updating.(5) Developing aligned systems and protocols with 9-1-1 and 9-8-8 to strengthen integration and direct people to the right number for the right resources at the right time.(6) Promoting 2-1-1 awareness through public education and outreach opportunities.(7) Improving 2-1-1 system readiness, infrastructure, and capacity to respond to disasters and all hazard events, including by doing all of the following:(A) Completing local and statewide 2-1-1 emergency operations plans.(B) Securing needed infrastructure updates, tools, protocols, and training for both local disaster response and statewide mutual aid and network response.(C) Engaging with local counties, cities, community-based organizations, and voluntary organizations active in disaster response planning, regarding the role of the 2-1-1 system and communication protocols.(D) Providing emergency funding for 2-1-1 disaster activation when local or philanthropic funding is not available or not sufficient to match 2-1-1 disaster contact volume.(8)Implementing the duties of the 2-1-1 lead entity appointed by the Public Utilities Commission.(c)The 2-1-1 lead entity appointed by the Public Utilities Commission shall do all of the following:(1)Conduct statewide 2-1-1 system activities specified under this section.(2)Provide funding, if available, to local 2-1-1 providers for activities specified under this section.(3)Provide annual reports to the office on the 2-1-1 system status, use of any funds, and future 2-1-1 system funding needs.(d)The office shall annually communicate 2-1-1 system funding needs to the Department of Finance and the office of the Governor for consideration in state budget planning.(e)There is hereby created in the State Treasury the 2-1-1 Fund, the moneys in which shall be used for purposes of this section, upon appropriation by the Legislature.(d) The California 211 Providers Network shall annually provide a report to the office on the 2-1-1 system status, use of any funds, and future 2-1-1 system funding needs.